Colorado, session 2025B, SB25B-005.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1206, amend
(1)(g) and (1)(h); and add (1)(i) and (5) as follows:
10-16-1206. Health insurance affordability cash fund - creation
- repeal. (1) There is created in the state treasury the health insurance
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

affordability cash fund. The fund consists of:
(g) The federal share of the medical assistance payments received
pursuant to section 25.5-4-503 (2); and
(h) Gifts, grants, or donations received from private or public
sources; AND
(i) ANY OTHER MONEY THAT MAY BE APPROPRIATED OR
TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND.
(5) (a) ON SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER TWO HUNDRED SIXTY-FOUR THOUSAND TWO HUNDRED
SIXTY-EIGHT DOLLARS FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-2-105.8, add (4.7)
as follows:
33-2-105.8. Reintroduction of gray wolves on designated lands
west of the continental divide - public input in commission development
of restoration plan - compensation to owners of livestock - definitions
- repeal. (4.7) (a) THE DIVISION SHALL NOT USE MONEY APPROPRIATED
FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2025-26 FOR THE
PURPOSE OF ACQUIRING OR REINTRODUCING GRAY WOLVES. THE DIVISION
MAY USE MONEY APPROPRIATED FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2025-26 FOR THE
PURPOSES LISTED IN SUBSECTIONS (2)(e)(I) AND (2)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4.7) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 25B-005

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
1 SECTION 3. Appropriation to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter
2 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XV (5)(A), the affected totals, and footnote 79 as follows:
3
4 Section 2. Appropriation.
5 PART XV
6 DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
7
8 (5) DIVISION OF PARKS AND WILDLIFE
9 (A) Colorado Parks and Wildlife Operations
10 State Park Operations 64,834,343 63,934,343a 900,000(I)b
11 (332.1 FTE)
12 Wildlife Operations79, 80 134,373,507 2,147,712 97,525,795c 34,700,000(I)
13 134,109,239 1,883,444
14 (731.8 FTE)
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 25B-005

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
1 Vendor Commissions,
2 Fulfillment Fees, and Credit
3 Card Fees 11,684,700 11,684,700d
4 210,892,550
5 210,628,282
6
7 a Of these amounts, $49,667,313 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S., $8,800,000(I) shall be from the Great Outdoors
8 Colorado Program established in Section 1 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, $2,459,306(I) shall be from Lottery proceeds pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the State
9 Constitution, $2,243,971 shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S., $641,063 shall be from the Off-highway Vehicle Recreation
10 Fund created in Section 33-14.5-106 (1), C.R.S., and $122,690 shall be from the Snowmobile Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14-106 (1)(a), C.R.S. The appropriation from the
11 Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(f), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution,
12 amounts appropriated from the Great Outdoors Colorado Program and lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated and are shown for informational purposes only.
13 b This amount shall be from various sources of federal funds, including funds anticipated to be received from the United States Bureau of Reclamation through a cost-sharing agreement
14 to address the net operating deficit of Paonia, Vega, Rifle Gap, Crawford, Navajo, Mancos, and Ridgway State Parks, and is shown for informational purposes only.
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 25B-005

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
1 c Of these amounts, $84,110,795 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., $8,800,000(I) shall be from the Great Outdoors Colorado Program
2 established in Section 1 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, $3,000,000 shall be from the Wildlife Management Public Education Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (3.5)(a), C.R.S.,
3 $700,000 shall be from the Wolf Depredation Compensation Fund created in Section 33-1-128 (2)(a), C.R.S., $500,000 shall be from subscription revenues credited to the Colorado
4 Outdoors Magazine Revolving Fund created in Section 33-1-114 (1), C.R.S., $400,000 shall be from the Colorado Nongame Conservation and Wildlife Restoration Cash Fund created
5 in Section 33-1-125 (1)(a), C.R.S., and $15,000 shall be from the Federal Aid Projects Income Fund created in Section 33-1-119, C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the
6 State Constitution, amounts appropriated from the Great Outdoors Colorado Program and lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated and are shown for informational purposes only.
7 d Of this amount, an estimated $10,000,000 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $1,350,000 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor
8 Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $250,000 shall be from the Off-highway Vehicle Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14.5-106 (1), C.R.S.,
9 an estimated $31,700 shall be from the sale of migratory waterfowl stamps pursuant to Section 33-4-102.5 (2), C.R.S., and an estimated $53,000 shall be from the Snowmobile Recreation
10 Fund created in Section 33-14-106 (1)(a), C.R.S.
11
12 TOTALS PART XV
13 (NATURAL
14 RESOURCES) $476,725,197 $57,345,170 $367,162,434a $9,587,533b $42,630,060c
15 $476,460,929 $57,080,902
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 25B-005

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
1
2 a Of this amount, $35,474,230 contains an (I) notation and an estimated $31,417,277 is from the Severance Tax Operational Fund pursuant to Section 39-29-109.3 (1), C.R.S.
3 b Of this amount, $1,115,249 contains an (I) notation.
4 c This amount contains an (I) notation.
5
6 FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
7
8 79 Department of Natural Resources, Division of Parks and Wildlife, Colorado Parks and Wildlife Operations, Wildlife Operations -- It is the General Assembly's
9 intent that $2,100,000 $1,835,732 General Fund appropriated for this line item be used for the implementation of Proposition 114 for the reintroduction and
10 management of gray wolves.
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 25B-005

SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Connor Randall
SECRETARY OF ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 25B-005